Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1688.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 38, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 38-102, to read: START_STATUTE38-102. Membership associations; annual revenue; public monies; website; definition A. A membership association in this state that receives over fifty percent of its annual revenue from dues that are paid by an elected or appointed official or a staff member of an elected or appointed official using public monies shall publicly disclose all fees and annual membership costs on its website to ensure transparency regarding services and fees paid by elected or appointed officials or staff members of elected or appointed officials using public monies. B. If a public body votes to join a membership association in this state and an official on the public body or a staff member of the public body elects not to join the membership ASSOCIATION, the dues assessed to that official or staff member shall not be paid to the membership association by the public body. C. For the purposes of this section, "membership association": 1. Means a nonprofit ORGANIZATION, the majority of whose board members are officers who support, advocate for, ADVISE, operate, control and supervise public entities in this state. 2. Does not include labor organizations. END_STATUTE